North Carolina statutes. Chapter 43. Land Registration.
Article 7. Liens upon Registered Lands.

§ 43-45.
Docketed judgments.

Whenever any judgment of the superior court of the county in which the registered estate is situated shall be duly docketed in the office of the clerk of the superior court, or any lien or notice of lis pendens is filed in the office of the clerk of the superior court, it shall be the duty of the clerk, upon the request of any interested party, to certify the same to the register of deeds. The register of deeds shall enter upon the certificate of title, the date, and the amount of the judgment, and the same shall be a lien upon such land as fully as such docketed judgment would be a lien upon unregistered lands of the judgment debtor, and the register of deeds is authorized to recover the certificate of title pursuant to

G.S. 43-40

. The register of deeds shall also enter notice of the judgment, lien, or lis pendens on the record copy of the certificate of title, and the encumbrance is valid against the registered estate from the time it is noted on the record copy.

History.

1913, c. 90, s. 22; C.S., s. 2418; 1999-59, s. 6.

§ 43-46.
Notice of delinquent taxes filed.

It shall be the duty of the tax collector of each taxing unit, not later than June 30 following the date the taxes became delinquent, to file an exact memorandum of the delinquency, if any, of any registered land for the nonpayment of the taxes or assessments thereon, including interest, in the office of the register of deeds for registration; and if such officer fails to perform such duty, and there shall be subsequent to such day a transfer of the land as hereinbefore provided, the grantee shall acquire a good title free from any lien for such taxes and assessments, and the collector and his sureties shall be liable for the payment of the taxes and assessments with the interest thereon. The register of deeds shall enter the notice of delinquency on the record copy of the certificate of title, and the tax lien shall be valid against the registered estate from the time it is noted on the record copy. The register of deeds shall enter the notice of cancellation of the tax lien on the record copy of the certificate of title upon presentation of satisfactory evidence of payment.

History.

1913, c. 90, s. 21; C.S., s. 2419; 1999-59, s. 7; 2000-140, s. 9.

§ 43-47.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1999-59, s. 8, effective January 1, 2000.

§ 43-48.
Foreclosure of tax lien.

The lien for ad valorem taxes may be foreclosed and the property sold pursuant to

G.S. 105-375

. A note of the sale under this section shall be duly registered, and a certificate shall be entered and an owner’s certificate issued in favor of the purchaser in whom title shall be thereby vested as registered owner, in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter. Nothing in this section shall be so construed as to affect or divert the title of a tenant in reversion or remainder to any real estate which has been returned delinquent and sold on account of the default of the tenant for life in paying the taxes or assessments thereon.

History.

1913, c. 90, s. 23; C.S., s. 2421; 1999-59, s. 9.